Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska61-223
Water Sustainability Fund; legislative intent.

The Legislature finds that water sustainability programs, projects, and activities are complex, multiyear endeavors that require a stable source of state funding support in order for the required matching funds to be secured and for projects to be completed in a timely and successful manner. It is the intent of the Legislature that transfers of money from the General Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund be maintained at the level established in section 61-222 for a minimum of ten fiscal years.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 20.